Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 2. Disaster Relief Fund.

Administrative Code. —

For disaster assistance programs, see 6 AAC 94.

Sec. 26.23.300.
Disaster relief fund.

There is in the Office of the Governor a disaster relief fund. The Department of Revenue is custodian of the fund.

Subject to the restrictions of AS

26.23.020(h)

— (k), the governor may expend the assets of the disaster relief fund for the following purposes:

to implement provisions of law relating to disaster relief in the case of a disaster or an incident;

to alleviate the effects of a disaster or an incident by making grants or loans to persons or political subdivisions on terms the governor considers appropriate or by other means the governor considers appropriate.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 4 SLA 2000.]

The governor shall present to the legislature an annual accounting of money expended from the disaster relief fund.

The governor shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

(§ 17 ch 178 SLA 1990; am §§ 5, 7 ch 4 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For temporary provisions relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared January 15, 2021, see ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts. For legislative approval of a financing plan to cope with that disaster, see sec. 5, ch. 2, SLA 2021.

Administrative Code. —

For 1998 western Alaska fisheries disaster emergency disaster assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 1.

For individual and family disaster grants, see 6 AAC 94, art. 2.

For temporary housing assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 3.